Hawaii statutes.
[§293-2] Bicycle dealers, records required.
All persons selling new bicycles to others as a business shall keep a record
for four years after the sale of a bicycle of the name of the purchaser, and
the serial number, description, and make of the bicycle sold to the purchaser.
This record may be inspected by the police during reasonable business hours. [L
1972, c 25, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next